Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.635

Appointment of special agent.

The court may appoint a special agent, to assist in implementing a protective arrangement under this article. The special agent has the authority conferred by the order of appointment and serves until discharged by court order.

[ 2019 c 437 s 512.]